en: ferric diphosphate, iron diphosphate, ferrous phosphate
bg: Железен дифосфат
cs: difosforečnan železitý
da: ferridiphosphat
de: Eisendiphosphat, Eisenpyrophosphat
el: διφωσφορικός σίδηρος, πυροφωσφορικός σίδηρος
es: difosfato férrico, pirofosfato férrico
et: rauddifosfaat, raudpürofosfaat
fi: ferridifosfaatti, ferripyrofosfaatti
fr: diphosphate ferrique, pyrophosphate ferrique, diphosphate de fer, pyrophosphate de fer
hr: željezo pirofosfat
hu: vas-difoszfát, ferri-pirofoszfát
it: difosfato di ferro
ja: ピロリン酸第二鉄, ピロリン酸鉄
lt: geležies difosfatas, geležies pirofosfata
lv: dzelzs difosfāts, dzelzs pirofosfāts
mt: difosfat ferriku, pirofosfat ferriku
nl: ijzerdifosfaat, ijzerfosfaat, ijzerpyrofosfaat
pl: difosforan żelaza, pirofosforan żelaza, pirofosforan żelazowy, difosforan żelazowy
pt: difisato de ferro, pirofosfato férrico
ro: difosfat feric, pirofosfat feric
sk: difosforečnan železitý, pyrofosforečnan železitý
sl: železov difosfat, železov pirofosfat
sv: ferridifosfat, ferripyrofosfat, järndifosfat
ta: இரும்பு பைரோபாசுபேட்டு
zh: 焦磷酸铁

en: ferric orthophosphate, ferric phosphate, iron orthophosphate, iron phosphate
es: ortofosfato férrico
it: fosfato ferrico, ferro ortofosfato, ferro fosfato

en: ferric saccharate
bg: Железен захарат
cs: sacharát železitý
de: Eisensaccharat
el: σακχαρικός σίδηρος
es: sacarato férrico
et: raud(III)sahharaat
fi: ferrisakkaraatti
fr: saccharate ferrique
hu: vas(III)-szacharát
it: saccarato ferrico
lt: geležies sacharatas
lv: dzelzs saharāts
mt: sakkarat ferriku
nl: ijzer (III) saccharaat
pl: cukrzan żelaza(III)
pt: sacarato férrico
ro: zaharat feric
sk: sacharát železitý
sl: železov saharat
sv: ferrisackarat

en: elemental iron
bg: Елементарно желязо
cs: elementární železo
de: Elementares Eisen
el: στοιχειακός σίδηρος
es: hierro elemental
et: elementaarne raud
fi: alkuainemuotoinen rauta
fr: fer élémentaire
hr: elementarno željezo
hu: elemi vas
it: ferro elementare
lt: elementinė geležis
lv: elementārā dzelzs
mt: adid elementali
nl: elementair ijzer
pl: żelazo elementarne
pt: ferro elementar
ro: fier elementar
sk: elementárne železo
sl: elementarno železo
sv: elementarjärn

en: ferrous bisglycinate
bg: Железен бисглицинат
cs: bisglycinát železnatý
de: Eisenbisglycinat
el: διγλυκινικός σίδηρος
es: bisglicinato ferroso
et: rauddiglütsinaat
fi: ferrobisglysinaatti
fr: bisglycinate ferreux
hu: vas-biszglicinát
it: bisglicinato ferroso
lt: geležies bisglicinatas
lv: dzelzs bisglicināts
mt: bisgliċinat ferruż
nl: ijzer bisglycinaat
pl: diglicynian żelaza
pt: bisglicinato ferroso
ro: bisglicinat feros
sk: bisglycinát železnatý
sl: železov bisglicinat
sv: ferrobisglycinat

en: ferrous L-pidolate
bg: Железен L-пидолат
cs: L-pyroglutaman (pidolát) železnatý
de: Eisen-L-pidolat
el: L-πιδολικός σίδηρος
es: L-pidolato ferroso
et: raud-L-pidolaat
fi: ferro-L-pidolaatti
fr: L-pidolate ferreux
hu: vas-L-pidolát
it: L-pidolato ferroso
lt: geležies L-pidolatas
lv: dzelzs L-pidolāts
mt: L-pidolat ferruż
nl: ijzer-L-pidolaat
pl: L-pidolan żelaza
pt: L-pidolato ferroso
ro: L-pidolat feros
sk: L-pidolát železnatý
sl: železov L-pidolat
sv: ferro-L-pidolat

en: reduced iron
es: hierro reducido
fr: fer réduit

en: iron salts
es: sales de hierro
it: sali di ferro

en: ferric pyrophosphate
it: pirofosfato ferrico
pl: dwufosforan żelazowy

en: phosphor
es: fosforo
it: fosforo

en: phosphate
bg: фосфат, фосфати
de: Phosphat
es: Fosfato
fi: fosfaatti, fosfaatit
fr: phosphate, orthophosphate
hr: fosfat
hu: foszfát, foszfátok
it: fosfato
nl: fosfaat
pt: fosfato, fosfatos

en: sulfates, sulfate, sulphate
af: Sulfaat
ar: كبريتات
az: Sulfatlar
be: Сульфаты
bg: Сулфат
bn: সালফেট আয়ন
bs: Sulfati, Sulfat
ca: Sulfatar, Sulfat
cs: Sulfáty, Sulfát
da: Sulfat
de: Sulfate, Sulfat
eo: sulfato
es: Sulfatos, Sulfato
et: Sulfaadid
eu: Sulfatoa, Sulfato
fa: سولفات
fi: Sulfaatit, Sulfaatti
fr: sulfates
gl: Sulfato
he: סולפט
hi: सल्फेट
hr: Sulfati
hu: Szulfát
hy: Սուլֆատներ
id: Sulfat
it: Solfato
kk: Сульфаттар
ko: 황산염
lt: Sulfatas, Sulfatai
lv: Sulfāti
ms: Sulfat
nb: sulfat
nl: sulfaten, Sulfaat
nn: sulfat
pl: siarczan, siarczany
pt: sulfato
ro: Sulfat
ru: сульфаты, сульфат
sh: Sulfati, Sulfat
sk: Síran
sl: Sulfat
sq: Sulfat
sr: Сулфати, Сулфат
sv: Sulfater, Sulfat
ta: சல்பேற்று
th: ซัลเฟต
tl: Sulfato
tr: Sülfat
uk: Сульфати, Сульфат
vi: Sulfat
zh: 硫酸鹽

en: zinc
af: sink
am: ዚንክ
an: Zinc
ar: زنك
as: জিংক
az: Sink
ba: Цинк
be: Цынк
bg: Цинк
bn: দস্তা
bo: ཏི་ཚ།
br: Zink
bs: cink
ca: zinc
co: Zingu
cs: Zinek
cv: Цинк
cy: Sinc
da: Zink
de: Zink
dv: ޒިންކް
el: Ψευδάργυρος
eo: zinko
es: Zinc
et: Tsink
eu: zink
fa: روی
fi: Sinkki
fo: Sink
fr: Zinc
fy: Sink
ga: Sinc
gd: Sinc
gl: Cinc
gu: જસત
gv: Shinc
he: אבץ
hi: जस्ता
hr: Cink
ht: Zenk
hu: Cink
hy: ցինկ
ia: zinc
id: seng
io: zinko
is: sink
it: Zinco
ja: 亜鉛
jv: Sèng
ka: თუთია
ki: Zinc
kk: Мырыш
kn: ಸತುವು
ko: 아연
ku: Çînko
kv: Цинк
ky: Цинк
la: zincum
lb: Zénk
li: Zink
lt: Cinkas
lv: Cinks
mi: konutea
mk: цинк
ml: നാകം
mn: Цайр
mr: जस्त
ms: Timah sari
mt: Żingu
my: သွပ်
nb: Sink
ne: जस्ता
nl: Zink
nn: sink
oc: Zinc
or: ଦସ୍ତା
pa: ਜਿਸਤ
pi: जिंक
pl: Cynk
pt: Zinco
qu: Tsinku
ro: zinc
ru: Цинк
sa: दस्ता
sd: جست
sh: Cink
sk: Zinok
sl: Cink
sn: Zeng'e
so: Sinki
sq: Zinku
sr: цинк
su: Séng
sv: Zink
sw: Zinki
ta: துத்தநாகம்
te: తుత్తునాగము
tg: Руҳ
th: สังกะสี
tl: Sink
tr: Çinko
tt: тутыя
ug: سىنك
uk: цинк
ur: خارصین
uz: Rux
vi: kẽm
zh: 锌

en: zinc acetate
bg: Цинков ацетат
cs: octan zinečnatý
de: Zinkacetat
el: οξικός ψευδάργυρος
es: acetato de cinc
et: tsinkatsetaat
fi: sinkkiasetaatti
fr: acétate de zinc
hu: cink-acetát
it: acetato di zinco
lt: cinko acetatas
lv: cinka acetāts
mt: aċetat taż-żingu
nl: zinkacetaat
pl: octan cynku
pt: acetato de zinco
ro: acetat de zinc
sk: octan zinočnatý
sl: cinkov acetat
sv: zinkacetat

en: zinc chloride
bg: Цинков хлорид
cs: chlorid zinečnatý
de: Zinkchlorid
el: χλωριούχος ψευδάργυρος
es: cloruro de cinc
et: tsinkkloriid
fi: sinkkikloridi
fr: chlorure de zinc
hu: cink-klorid
it: cloruro di zinco
lt: cinko chloridas
lv: cinka hlorīds
mt: klorur taż-żingu
nl: zinkchloride
pl: chlorek cynku
pt: cloreto de zinco
ro: clorură de zinc
sk: chlorid zinočnatý
sl: cinkov klorid
sv: zinkklorid

en: zinc citrate
bg: Цинков цитрат
cs: citronan zinečnatý
de: Zinkcitrat
el: κιτρικός ψευδάργυρος
es: citrato de cinc
et: tsinktsitraat
fi: sinkkisitraatti
fr: citrate de zinc
hr: cinkov citrat
hu: cink-citrát
it: citrato di zinco
lt: cinko citratas
lv: cinka citrāts
mt: ċitrat taż-żingu
nl: zinkcitraat
pl: cytrynian cynku
pt: citrato de zinco
ro: citrat de zinc
sk: citran zinočnatý
sl: cinkov citrat
sv: zinkcitrat

en: zinc gluconate
ar: غلوكونات الزنك
bg: Цинков глюконат
ca: gluconat de zinc
cs: glukonan zinečnatý
da: zinkgluconat
de: Zinkgluconat
el: γλυκονικός ψευδάργυρος
es: gluconato de cinc
et: tsinkglükonaat
fa: گلوکونات روی
fi: sinkkiglukonaatti
fr: gluconate de zinc
hr: cinkov glukonat
hu: cink-glükonát
it: gluconato di zinco
ja: グルコン酸亜鉛
lt: cinko gliukonatas
lv: cinka glikonāts
mt: glukonat taż-żingu
nl: zinkgluconaat
nn: sinkglukonat
pl: glukonian cynku
pt: gluconato de zinco
ro: gluconat de zinc
sh: Cink glukonat
sk: glukónan zinočnatý
sl: cinkov glukonat
sr: Cink glukonat
sv: zinkglukonat

en: zinc lactate
bg: Цинков лактат
cs: mléčnan zinečnatý
de: Zinklactat
el: γαλακτικός ψευδάργυρος
es: lactato de cinc
et: tsinklaktaat
fi: sinkkilaktaatti
fr: lactate de zinc
hr: cinkov laktat
hu: cink-laktát
it: lattato di zinco
lt: cinko laktatas
lv: cinka laktāts
mt: laktat taż-żingu
nl: zinklactaat
pl: mleczan cynku
pt: lactato de zinco
ro: lactat de zinc
sk: mliečnan zinočnatý
sl: cinkov laktat
sv: zinklaktat

en: zinc oxide
xx: 3b603
ar: أكسيد الزنك
bg: Цинков оксид
bn: জিঙ্ক অক্সাইড
bs: Cink oksid
ca: òxid de zinc
cs: Oxid zinečnatý
cy: Sinc ocsid
da: Zinkoxid
de: Zinkoxid
el: Οξείδιο του ψευδαργύρου
eo: zinka oksido
es: óxido de zinc
fa: روی اکسید
fi: Sinkkioksidi
fr: oxyde de zinc
hi: जिंक ऑक्साइड
hr: cink-oksid, cinkov oksid
hu: Cink-oxid
id: Seng oksida
it: ossido di zinco
ja: 酸化亜鉛
kk: Мырыш тотығы
la: Oxidum zinci
lt: cinko oksidas, Cinko baltasis
mk: Цинк оксид
mt: ossidu taż-żingu
nb: sinkoksid, Sinkhvitt
nl: zinkoxide
pl: tlenek cynku
pt: óxido de zinco
ro: Oxid de zinc
ru: оксид цинка
sh: Cink oksid
si: සින්ක් ඔක්සයිඩ්
sk: Oxid zinočnatý
sl: Cinkov oksid
sr: цинк оксид
sv: Zinkoxid
te: జింక్ ఆక్సైడ్
th: สังกะสีออกไซด์
uk: Оксид цинку
vi: Kẽm ôxít
zh: 氧化鋅

en: zinc carbonate
bg: Цинков карбонат
cs: uhličitan zinečnatý
de: Zinkcarbonat
el: ανθρακικός ψευδάργυρος
es: carbonato de cinc
et: tsinkkarbonaat
fi: sinkkikarbonaatti
fr: carbonate de zinc
hu: cink-karbonát
it: carbonato di zinco
lt: cinko karbonatas
lv: cinka karbonāts
mt: karbonat taż-żingu
nl: zinkcarbonaat
pl: węglan cynku
pt: carbonato de zinco
ro: carbonat de zinc
sk: uhličitan zinočnatý
sl: cinkov karbonat
sv: zinkkarbonat